District of Columbia statutes.
31-3112

Excluded programs.

This chapter shall not be applicable to the District of Columbia Alliance Program, Medicaid Program, and Post-1987 District of Columbia Employees’ Health Insurance Benefits Plan.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-195, § 12a
as added Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-242, § 2(i), 54 DCR 601
Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-242 provided: “Section 2 shall apply to all individual and group health benefit plans issued or renewed on the first day of the month beginning on or after 90 days after the effective date of this act.”